Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 5.
PER DIEM AND MILEAGE OF GENERAL ASSEMBLY (CONST., ART. 5, § 16 AMENDED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment amended Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 16, which was subsequently repealed by Ark. Const. Amend. 94.
Amendment 5 was declared to have been adopted by the Speaker of the House of Representatives on February 10, 1913 (see Acts 1913, p. 1525). The vote for the amendment was 103,246 and the vote against the amendment was 33,397.

See Berry v. Gordon, 237 Ark. 547 and 865, 376 S.W.2d 279 (1964), and State ex. rel. Purcell v. Jones, 242 Ark. 168, 412 S.W.2d 284 (1967), for discussion of implied repeal of this provision by subsequent amendments.

Compensation, including per diem and mileage, of General Assembly members is now governed by Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 31.